District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

28-3911

District of Columbia Consumer Protection Fund.

Repealed.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 1402(f), 47 DCR 6308
Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-237, § 2(d), 54 DCR 393
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 3023, 54 DCR 7052
Jan. 23, 2008, D.C. Law 17-68, § 2, 54 DCR 11648
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 3002, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9003(a), 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the District of Columbia Consumer Protection Fund Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-34, October 18, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 10704).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 1402(f) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1402(f) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Residential Water Lead Level Test Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-436, May 25, 2004, 51 DCR 5953).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of District of Columbia Consumer Protection Fund Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-64, June 28, 2007, 54 DCR 7046).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3023 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of District of Columbia Consumer Protection Fund Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-138, October 17, 2007, 54 DCR 10729).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3002 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3002 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
Short title: Section 3001 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle A of title III of the act may be cited as the “Consumer Protection Funds Act of 2009”.
Section 9052(b) of D.C. Law 19-21 purported to amended this section which was repealed by section 9003(a) of Law 19-21.